Illinois, session 104th, SB2952.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by adding Section 55-12025 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-12025 new)7    Sec. 5-12025. Vehicle impact protection device.8    (a) As used in this Section:9    "Day care center outdoor play area" means an area 10designated as a play area outside an establishment providing 11care for more than 3 adults or children in a protective setting 12for less than 24 hours per day that is not located within a 13residential dwelling unit. "Day care center outdoor play area" 14does not include an area designated as a play area outside day 15care programs operated by an elementary school, middle school, 16high school, park, or place of worship.17    "Outdoor dining area" means an outdoor seating area that 18is typically connected to an indoor seating area for a 19restaurant.20    "Residential care facility" means a care facility licensed 21for 24-hour medical or non-medical care of people in need of 22supervision or assistance essential for daily, living, or for 23the protection of the individual. "Residential care facility"   SB2952- 2 -LRB104 17875 TRT 31311 b1includes assisted living facilities, independent living 2facilities, nursing homes, hospice, and continuum of care 3facilities. "Residential care facility" does not include a 4community residences or transitional treatment facilities. 5    "Vehicle impact protection device" means a concrete or 6metal barrier that is designed to protect people and property 7from moving vehicles. "Vehicle impact protection device" 8includes, but is not limited to, a bollard or decorative 9planter designed to protect people and property from moving 10vehicles.11    (b) To safeguard pedestrians, buildings, and building 12occupants, a county shall, by ordinance or resolution, require 13the installation and maintenance of vehicle impact protection 14devices in front of:15        (1) all public entrances to residential care 16    facilities and buildings in areas zoned as business and 17    manufacturing districts; and18        (2) any buildings where storefront windows are within 19    2 feet of the ground, any outdoor dining area, and any day 20    care center outdoor play areas if the building, outdoor 21    dining area, or day care center outdoor play area has:22            (A) adjacent parking spaces that are perpendicular 23        to or angled toward the building or area;24            (B) drive aisles that are perpendicular to the 25        building or area; or26            (C) both.  SB2952- 3 -LRB104 17875 TRT 31311 b1    (c) The vehicle impact protection devices required under 2this Section shall be designed to withstand, at minimum, an 3impact resistance level of 5,000 pounds at 30 miles per hour. 4The devices must have a minimum height of 3 feet and must be 5spaced 48 inches from inside edge to inside edge of the device. 6Vehicle impact protection devices must not restrict access to 7the building and must be designed and installed to meet the 8requirements of the Illinois Accessibility Code and all other 9State and federal laws. Vehicle impact protection devices 10shall be manufactured from finished metal or have a decorative 11cover that is complimentary to the design of the associated 12building, storefront, outdoor dining area, or day care center.13    (d) Vehicle impact protection devices may be located along 14the outside wall of a building, along the edge of an adjacent 15sidewalk, at the end of an adjacent parking space, or in 16another location as approved by the county by ordinance or 17resolution. When vehicle impact protection devices are located 18within a parking space, the parking space must be adequately 19sized to meet the requirements set by the county.20    (e) A county may install plain concrete barriers, such as 21jersey barriers, temporarily, for a period not to exceed 90 22days, while awaiting the installation of new or replacement of 23permanent vehicle impact protection devices.24    (f) The requirements of this Section do not apply to 25voluntarily installed vehicle impact protection devices that 26are not required by this Section.   SB2952- 4 -LRB104 17875 TRT 31311 b1    (g) A home rule county may not regulate the installation 2of vehicle impact protection devices in a manner less 3restrictive than the regulation by the State of the 4installation of vehicle impact protection devices under this 5Section. This Section is a limitation under subsection (i) of 6Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the 7concurrent exercise by home rule units of powers and functions 8exercised by the State. 9    Section 10. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 10adding Section 11-13-30 as follows: 11    (65 ILCS 5/11-13-30 new)12    Sec. 11-13-30. Vehicle impact protection devices.13    (a) As used in this Section:14    "Day care center outdoor play area" means an area 15designated as a play area outside an establishment providing 16care for more than 3 adults or children in a protective setting 17for less than 24 hours per day that is not located within a 18residential dwelling unit. "Day care center outdoor play area" 19does not include an area designated as a play area outside day 20care programs operated by an elementary school, middle school, 21high school, park, or place of worship.22    "Outdoor dining area" means an outdoor seating area that 23is typically connected to an indoor seating area for a 24restaurant.  SB2952- 5 -LRB104 17875 TRT 31311 b1    "Residential care facility" means a care facility licensed 2for 24-hour medical or non-medical care of people in need of 3supervision or assistance essential for daily, living, or for 4the protection of the individual. "Residential care facility" 5includes assisted living facilities, independent living 6facilities, nursing homes, hospice, and continuum of care 7facilities. "Residential care facility" does not include a 8community residences or transitional treatment facilities. 9    "Vehicle impact protection device" means a concrete or 10metal barrier that is designed to protect people and property 11from moving vehicles. "Vehicle impact protection device" 12includes, but is not limited to, a bollard or decorative 13planter designed to protect people and property from moving 14vehicles.15    (b) To safeguard pedestrians, buildings, and building 16occupants, a municipality shall, by ordinance or resolution, 17require the installation and maintenance of vehicle impact 18protection devices in front of:19        (1) all public entrances to residential care 20    facilities and buildings in areas zoned as business and 21    manufacturing districts;22        (2) any buildings where storefront windows are within 23    2 feet of the ground, any outdoor dining area, and any day 24    care center outdoor play areas if the building, outdoor 25    dining area, or day care center outdoor play area has:26            (A) adjacent parking spaces that are perpendicular   SB2952- 6 -LRB104 17875 TRT 31311 b1        to or angled toward the building or area;2            (B) drive aisles that are perpendicular to the 3        building or area; or4            (C) both. 5    (c) The vehicle impact protection devices required under 6this Section shall be designed to withstand, at minimum, an 7impact resistance level of 5,000 pounds at 30 miles per hour. 8The devices must have a minimum height of 3 feet and must be 9spaced 48 inches from inside edge to inside edge of the device. 10Vehicle impact protection devices must not restrict access to 11the building and must be designed and installed to the 12requirements set forth in the Illinois Accessibility Code and 13all other State and federal laws. Vehicle impact protection 14devices shall be manufactured from finished metal or have a 15decorative cover that is complimentary to the design of the 16associated building, storefront, outdoor dining area, or day 17care center.18    (d) Vehicle impact protection devices may be located along 19the outside wall of a building, along the edge of an adjacent 20sidewalk, at the end of an adjacent parking space, or in 21another location as approved by the municipality by ordinance 22or resolution. When vehicle impact protection devices are 23located within a parking space, the parking space must be 24adequately sized to meet the requirements set by the 25municipality.26    (e) A municipality may install plain concrete barriers,   SB2952- 7 -LRB104 17875 TRT 31311 b1such as jersey barriers, temporarily, for a period not to 2exceed 90 days, while awaiting the installation of new or 3replacement of permanent vehicle impact protection devices.4    (f) The requirements of this Section do not apply to 5voluntarily installed vehicle impact protection devices that 6are not required by this Section. 7    (g) A home rule municipality may not regulate the 8installation of vehicle impact protection devices in a manner 9less restrictive than the regulation by the State of the 10installation of vehicle impact protection devices under this 11Section. This Section is a limitation under subsection (i) of 12Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the 13concurrent exercise by home rule units of powers and functions 14exercised by the State.